District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-1920

Duties and powers.

Repealed.

May 13, 1977, D.C. Law 1-134, title II, § 210, 24 DCR 406
June 30, 1978, D.C. Law 2-89, § 2, 24 DCR 9756
Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-166, § 2, 32 DCR 716
July 26, 1986, D.C. Law 6-131, § 2, 33 DCR 3407
Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-200, § 2, 34 DCR 521
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-228, § 3(a), 36 DCR 754
Nov. 25, 1993, D.C. Law 10-65, § 301(b), 40 DCR 7351
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-212, § 402, 43 DCR 4962

History

1981 Ed., § 32-220.
1973 Ed., § 32-1320.

Prior Codifications

See notes to § 44-1901.

Emergency Legislation

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 1-134, title II, § 201, eff. May 13, 1977, added §§ 32-211 to 32-224 [1981 Ed.].

D.C. Law 11-212, title IV, § 402 ( 43 DCR 4962), eff. April 9, 1997, provided: “The D.C. General Hospital Commission Act, effective May 13, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-134; D.C. Code § 32-201 et seq. [1981 Ed.]), is repealed.”

Title V, § 501(c) of D.C. Law 11-212, provided: “(c) Section 402 shall become effective upon the first meeting of the Board pursuant to section 204(h).”